test/src/morphology/N-aaita_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - āita: # Noun 46 'eng /est ait/fin' - full paradigm
     āita+N+Sg+Nom: āita
     āita+N+Sg+Gen: āita
     āita+N+Sg+Par: aitõ
     āita+N+Sg+Dat: āitan
     āita+N+Sg+Ins: āitaks
     āita+N+Sg+Ill: aitõ
     āita+N+Sg+Ela: āitast
     āita+N+Pl+Nom: āitad
     āita+N+Pl+Gen: āitad
     āita+N+Pl+Par: āitidi
     āita+N+Pl+Dat: āitadõn
     āita+N+Pl+Ins: āitadõks
     āita+N+Pl+Ill: āitiž
     āita+N+Pl+Ela: āitist
